Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.375

Order to preserve or apply property while proceeding pending.

While a petition under RCW 11.130.365 is pending, after preliminary hearing and without notice to others, the court may issue an order to preserve and apply property of the respondent as required for the support of the respondent or an individual who is in fact dependent on the respondent. The court may appoint a special agent to assist in implementing the order.

[ 2019 c 437 s 404.]